Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 6. Agriculture

Executive Order No. 6-1
(No. 98-90) [Designation of Vermont Housing and Conservation Board as State Trust Fund for Agricultural Resource Conservation Demonstration Program.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 14-96 (codified as Executive Order No. 10-20), dated September 10, 1996.

Executive Order No. 6-2
(No. 09-00) [Governor’s Council for Interstate Compacts.

Expired effective December 31, 2003.

Executive Order No. 6-3
(No. 10-00) [Governor’s Council for Interstate Compacts.

Expired effective December 31, 2003.

Executive Order No. 6-4
(No. 05-18) Vermont Agriculture Innovation Center.

WHEREAS, the federal Farm Security and Rural Investment Act of 2002 (Public Law 107-171) (the “Act”) directed the federal Secretary of Agriculture to establish an Agriculture Innovation Center Demonstration Program under which agricultural producers are
provided:

Technical assistance, consisting of engineering services, applied research, scale production, and similar services, to enable the agricultural producers to establish businesses to produce value-added agricultural commodities or products;

Assistance in marketing, market development, and business planning; and

Organizational, outreach, and development assistance to increase the viability, growth, and sustainability of businesses that produce value-added agricultural commodities or products; and

WHEREAS, although Vermont once had a statutorily created agriculture innovation center for purposes of this Program, that law was repealed effective March 31, 2013 and Vermont no longer has an entity that meets the requirements of the Act; and

WHEREAS, Vermont now has the opportunity to obtain federal funding under the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2018 (Public Law 115-141) to establish an agriculture innovation center that meets the requirements of the Act for work on providing technical
and business development assistance to agricultural producers seeking to enter into ventures that add value to commodities or products they produce.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby create the Vermont Agriculture Innovation Center (AIC), as follows:

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets (the Secretary), who will serve as chair.

One representative from each of the four highest grossing commodities produced in Vermont, determined on the basis of annual gross cash sales. These commodity groups presently are the dairy, maple, livestock, and apple industries. The Secretary will appoint
these four representatives with the approval of the Governor.

One representative from each of the two general agricultural organizations with the greatest number of members in Vermont, as selected by each organization.

All board member representatives, except for the Secretary, shall be appointed for terms of three years and shall serve no more than two consecutive three-year terms.

Composition and Appointments

The AIC shall have a board of directors composed of, at a minimum, the following seven representatives:

Meetings

The Secretary shall call the first meeting of the Board to occur on or before December 1, 2018, contingent upon receipt of the federal funding. After the first meeting, the Board shall meet on an as needed basis, as determined by the Secretary. A majority
of the members of the Board shall constitute a quorum. No action of the Board shall be considered valid unless the action is supported by a majority of the quorum.

Powers and Duties

The AIC will fund Vermont-based initiatives that provide technical assistance, including assistance as necessary with permitting, organization development, and research and marketing services to support value-added agricultural businesses. The AIC may
also provide grants to individual businesses to assist in the production and marketing of value-added products.

Assistance

The Board shall have the administrative, technical, and legal assistance of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets. Other departments and agencies of State government will cooperate with the AIC and will provide information and data upon request
on an as-needed basis to assist the AIC in carrying out its duties.

Expense Reimbursement

I hereby authorize per diem compensation and reasonable and necessary expense reimbursement for travel and food for members who are not full time State employees pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
.

Effective Date

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated July 26, 2018.

Executive Order No. 6-5 Effective until January 1, 2024 unless extended by the Governor. (No. 03-21) [Governor’s Commission on the Future of Vermont Agriculture.

WHEREAS, Vermont’s iconic landscape of farms and pastoral open lands, forests and human communities and their associated dining, shopping, event and learning opportunities are major reasons why people visit and live in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, Vermont agriculture is a principal economic driver for our rural communities and is essential to feeding Vermont’s residents, building Vermont’s economy, employing Vermonters, and attracting visitors; and

WHEREAS, Vermont is known for its agriculture and its food—including maple, meat, apples, dairy, bountiful produce at farmers markets, cheese and ice cream—and Vermont products are synonymous with outstanding quality; and

WHEREAS, Vermont’s agriculture and food system accounts for 64,000 direct jobs and its food system generates $11.3 billion in annual economic output; and

WHEREAS, Vermont agriculture can play an important role in welcoming farmers, food processors and entrepreneurs, and offering opportunities to people who are black or indigenous or people of color; and

WHEREAS, Vermont agriculture plays an important role in caring for Vermont’s most vulnerable, providing healthy, local and affordable food in settings ranging from school lunch programs, local food shelves, senior centers, local markets, heath care facilities
and kitchen tables; and

WHEREAS, our agricultural assets can and should be leveraged to sustain, grow and drive economic development in all sectors of Vermont’s economy with particular attention to farm, dining and retail businesses that grow, use and sell the State’s internationally
recognized food; and

WHEREAS, agriculture must be wisely managed and strengthened, not only to grow the sector’s economic development, but to sustain and enhance the value of the Vermont brand, the experience of visitors to Vermont and Vermonters’ quality of life; and

WHEREAS, Vermont agriculture must simultaneously preserve its undeveloped lands, harmoniously operate within our ecosystem, continue producing high-quality food and be environmentally sustainable; and

WHEREAS, because Vermont’s family farms and its local food system face many economic, environmental, regulatory and succession challenges, important work is necessary to preserve Vermont’s agricultural assets, expand our capabilities, become more inclusive
and diverse and improve access to healthy local food; and

WHEREAS, there exists a broad set of agriculture, business and environmental stakeholders but no platform for collective focus for developing a vision for the future of Vermont agriculture; and

WHEREAS, we must bring together State leaders, farmers, food and beverage producers, business, retail and distribution experts, and environmental and land use specialists to ensure a vibrant and stable future for Vermont food and agriculture.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby create the Governor’s Commission on the Future of Vermont Agriculture as follows:

Composition and Appointments.

The Governor’s Commission on the Future of Vermont Agriculture shall be comprised of no more than 14 members to be appointed by the Governor from inside and outside of government in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets (“AAFM”)
and the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (“ACCD”). The State members shall include the Secretary of AAFM or designee and the Secretary of ACCD or designee who shall serve as Co-Chairs. Non-State
members shall include: nine representatives from the industry sectors of beverages, dairy, maple, meat, produce, value added food, investor funding, retail and/or marketing, and supply chain and/or distribution; and three members
with relevant policy or land use expertise to represent the areas of agriculture, education and/or the provision of business services; environmental conservation and/or climate change; and land use and/r succession planning.

The Governor’s Commission on the Future of Vermont Agriculture may, in its discretion, establish working groups to support its mission, drawing membership from any agency or department of State government or private/non-profit entity. The Governor’s Commission
on the Future of Vermont Agriculture may, at its discretion, engage with private sector professionals to develop and implement the goals of this Executive Order.

The Commission shall receive administrative and staff support from AAFM and ACCD.

Commission Charge and Process.

The Governor’s Commission on the Future of Vermont Agriculture shall develop long and short-term strategies and specific action plans with measurable outcomes to, at minimum, address the following:

A.
Preserve and expand agricultural production and related economic, social, and ecological opportunities to help ensure that Vermont remains a vibrant agricultural State.

B.
Grow and develop Vermont agriculture and its related resources.

C.
Adopt and replicate efficiencies, partnerships and opportunities.

D.
Expand local producer, distributor, retail and marketing coordination.

E.
Create opportunities to expand the production, processing, market reach, availability, and sales of Vermont food.

F.
Preserve current agricultural businesses and facilitate sustained growth.

G.
Evaluate sustainable agriculture and production methods and consider how they may foster a more symbiotic relationship with the environment.

H.
Continue environmental progress.

I.
Make practices more affordable, increase production and grow local sales through better in-State coordination or better utilization of shared economies of scale.

J.
Connect farmers and producers with residents and visitors, to improve public perception, and to promote tourism and its connection to Vermont agriculture.

K.
Increase engagement with rural communities and next generation business owners, including New Americans and younger generations to encourage greater agricultural participation.

L.
Lower barriers to entry and facilitate greater inclusivity, access, equity, and diversity and augment positive trends.

M.
Examine and promote laws, policies and initiatives that support Vermont agriculture and its related resources.

The Commission shall be advisory to the Governor and shall report all findings and recommendations for an immediate action plan by November 15, 2021. The Commission shall also provide advice to the Governor as requested. The Commission shall measure and
evaluate progress and submit a supplemental report to the Governor assessing the impact of its work and implemented strategies on or before November 15, 2022 and November 15, 2023.

The Co-Chairs shall call the Commission to its first meeting on or before April 1, 2021, and the Commission shall then meet as needed, but no less frequently than monthly. Meetings of the Commission shall be held electronically for the duration of the
COVID-19-related state of emergency and for so long thereafter as the Commission deems practicable.

Each private member of the Commission shall be entitled to per diem compensation pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010
.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until January 1, 2024 unless extended by the Governor.

Dated February 19, 2021.

[Reserved for future use.]

[Reserved for future use.]